src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-kid_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 

# todo: 
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


   Noun - кид: # Noun 'a hand'
     кид+N+Sg+Nom: кид
     кид+N+Sg+Gen: кидӹн
     кид+N+Sg+Acc: кидӹм
     кид+N+Sg+Com: кидге
     кид+N+Sg+Dat: кидлӓн
     кид+N+Sg+Ine: кидӹштӹ
     кид+N+Sg+Ill: [кидӹш, кидӹшкӹ]
     кид+N+Sg+Lat: кидеш
     кид+N+Sg+Cmpr: кидлӓ
     кид+N+Sg+Abe: кидде

     кид+N+Pl+Nom: кидвлӓ

     кид+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+So/PC: кидем
     кид+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+So/PC: кидет
     кид+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+So/PC: кидшӹ
     кид+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+So/PC: киднӓ
     кид+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+So/PC: киддӓ
     кид+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+So/PC: кидӹштӹ
